District of Columbia statutes.
47-2864

Penalties.

(a)

If the District government determines at any time that an applicant knowingly falsified the certification required by this subchapter, the District government shall:

(1)

Proceed immediately to revoke each license or permit, the application for which contains such a falsified certification; and

(2)

Fine the applicant $1,000 for each false certification.

(b)

The penalties prescribed by this section shall be applicable only after the applicant is afforded an opportunity for a hearing by the agency which ordinarily would hold a hearing on a revocation of the affected license or permit, and these penalties shall be in addition to any other penalties available by law.

(c)

Nothing in this subchapter shall preclude an applicant from submitting a new application for a license or permit.

History

May 11, 1996, D.C. Law 11-118, § 5, 43 DCR 1191
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2865.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2864.